apertium-ava.ava.lexc
LEXICON N-RAGIAL

%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<erg%>:%>%{a%}лъ CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>%{a%}лъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:%>%{a%}лъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:%> LOC-CASES ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:%>ал%{ъ%} LOC-CASES ; ! Dir/LR

%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>%{a%}л CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<erg%>:%>%{a%}з CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:%>%{a%}зул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:%>%{a%}зе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>:%>%{a%}з LOC-CASES ; 

LEXICON NP-TOP-LENINSKIJ

%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<attr%>: # ; 

LEXICON NP-TOP-ROSSIJA

%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<attr%>: # ; 
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<erg%>:%>лъ CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>лъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:%>лъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>:%>л LOC-CASES ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN

%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<attr%>: # ; 
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<erg%>:%>%{a%}лъ CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>%{a%}лъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:%>%{a%}лъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>:%>%{a%}л LOC-CASES ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-BUJNAKSK

%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<attr%>: # ; 
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
!%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<erg%>: CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:и%>%{a%}лъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:и%>%{a%}лъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<top%>%<sg%>:и%>%{a%}л LOC-CASES ;


LEXICON NP-TOP-PL

%<np%>%<top%>%<pl%>%<attr%>: # ; 
%<np%>%<top%>%<pl%>%<nom%>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<np%>%<top%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:%>ялъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<top%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:%>ялъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<top%>%<pl%>:%>ял LOC-CASES ;

LEXICON NP-ACR-COMMON-JA

%<sg%>%<nom%>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<sg%>%<erg%>:%-%>ялъ CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<sg%>%<gen%>:%-%>ялъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<sg%>%<dat%>:%-%>ялъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<sg%>:%-%>ял LOC-CASES ;

%<sg%>%<erg%>:%>ялъ CLIT-SUBST-I ; ! Dir/LR
%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>ялъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; ! Dir/LR
%<sg%>%<dat%>:%>ялъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; ! Dir/LR
%<sg%>:%>ял LOC-CASES ;! Dir/LR

LEXICON NP-ACR-COMMON-A-SG

%<sg%>%<nom%>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<sg%>%<erg%>:%-%>алъ CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<sg%>%<gen%>:%-%>алъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<sg%>%<dat%>:%-%>алъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<sg%>:%-%>ал LOC-CASES ;

%<sg%>%<erg%>:%>алъ CLIT-SUBST-I ; ! Dir/LR
%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>алъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; ! Dir/LR
%<sg%>%<dat%>:%>алъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; ! Dir/LR
%<sg%>:%>ал LOC-CASES ;! Dir/LR

LEXICON NP-ACR-COMMON-A-PL

%<pl%>%<nom%>:%-%>ал CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<pl%>%<erg%>:%-%>аз CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<pl%>%<gen%>:%-%>азул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<pl%>%<dat%>:%-%>азе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<pl%>:%-%>аз LOC-CASES ;

%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>ал CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<pl%>%<erg%>:%>аз CLIT-SUBST-I ; ! Dir/LR
%<pl%>%<gen%>:%>азул CLIT-SUBST-I ; ! Dir/LR
%<pl%>%<dat%>:%>азе CLIT-SUBST-I ; ! Dir/LR
%<pl%>:%>аз LOC-CASES ;! Dir/LR

LEXICON NP-TOP-ACSH

%<np%>%<top%>: NP-ACR-COMMON-JA ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-SSSR

%<np%>%<top%>: NP-ACR-COMMON-A-SG ;

LEXICON NP-AL-NKVD

%<np%>%<al%>: NP-ACR-COMMON-JA ;

LEXICON NP-AL-KPSS

%<np%>%<al%>: NP-ACR-COMMON-A-SG ;

LEXICON NP-AL-GES

%<np%>%<al%>: NP-ACR-COMMON-A-SG ;
%<np%>%<al%>: NP-ACR-COMMON-A-PL ;

LEXICON NP-AL-EDINAJA-ROSSIJA 

%<np%>%<al%>%<nom%>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<np%>%<al%>%<erg%>:%>лъ CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<np%>%<al%>%<gen%>:%>лъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<al%>%<dat%>:%>лъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<al%>:%>л LOC-CASES ; 

LEXICON NP-AL

%<np%>%<al%>%<nom%>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<np%>%<al%>%<erg%>:%>%{a%}лъ CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<np%>%<al%>%<gen%>:%>%{a%}лъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<al%>%<dat%>:%>%{a%}лъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<al%>:%>%{a%}л LOC-CASES ; 

LEXICON NP-ANT-INIT

%<np%>%<ant%>%<mf%>%<attr%>: # ; 

LEXICON NP-ANT-M-DAKU

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<attr%>: # ; 
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<nom%>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<erg%>:%>ца CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<gen%>:%>л CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<dat%>:%>е CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>:%> LOC-CASES ; 

LEXICON NP-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<attr%>: # ; 
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<nom%>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<erg%>:%>ица CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<gen%>:%>ил CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<dat%>:%>ие CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>:%>и LOC-CASES ; 

LEXICON NP-ANT-F-MASHIDAT

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<attr%>: # ; 
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<nom%>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<erg%>:%>ица CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<gen%>:%>ил CLIT-SUBST-I ; 

LEXICON NP-ANT-F-ZAREMA

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<attr%>: # ; 
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<nom%>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<erg%>:%>ца CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<gen%>:%>л CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<dat%>:%>е CLIT-SUBST-I ; 

LEXICON NP-COG-DZE

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<erg%>:%>ца CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>л CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:%>е CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<sg%>:%> LOC-CASES ; 

LEXICON NP-COG-OJ

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:й CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<erg%>:%>яс CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>ясул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:%>ясе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<sg%>:%>яс LOC-CASES ; 

LEXICON NP-COG-IAN

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<erg%>:%>ица CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>ил CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:%>ие CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<sg%>:%>и LOC-CASES ; 

LEXICON NP-COG-IN

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<erg%>:%>ица CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>ил CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:%>ие CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>:%>и LOC-CASES ; 

%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:а CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<erg%>:а%>лъ CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:а%>лъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:а%>лъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>%<sg%>:а%>л LOC-CASES ; 

LEXICON NP-PAT-VICH

ич%<np%>%<pat%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<attr%>:ич # ; 
ич%<np%>%<pat%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ич # ; 
ич%<np%>%<pat%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<erg%>:ичас # ; 
ич%<np%>%<pat%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ичасул # ; 
ич%<np%>%<pat%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ичасе # ; 

на%<np%>%<pat%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<attr%>:на # ; 

LEXICON NP-COG-OV

NP-PAT-VICH ; 

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<erg%>:%>ас CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>асул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>асе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<sg%>:%>ас LOC-CASES ; 

%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:а CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<erg%>:а%>лъ CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:а%>лъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:а%>лъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>%<sg%>:а%>л LOC-CASES ; 

LEXICON A-DECL-NOCLIT

%<nt%>:%>б # ; 
%<m%>:%>в # ; 
%<f%>:%>й # ; 
%<pl%>:%>л # ; 


LEXICON A-DECL 

%<nt%>:%>б CLIT-ADJEC-I ; 
%<m%>:%>в CLIT-ADJEC-I ; 
%<f%>:%>й CLIT-ADJEC-I ; 
%<pl%>:%>л CLIT-ADJEC-I ; 

LEXICON A-GHARAB

%<adj%>: CLIT-ADJEC-I ; 

LEXICON A-KUDIJA

%<adj%>: A-DECL ; 

LEXICON A-BACICIADAB-M

%<adj%>%<m%>: CLIT-ADJEC-I ; 

LEXICON A-BACICIADAB-F

%<adj%>%<f%>: CLIT-ADJEC-I ; 

LEXICON A-BACICIADAB-NT

%<adj%>%<nt%>: CLIT-ADJEC-I ; 

LEXICON A-BACICIADAB-PL

%<adj%>%<pl%>: CLIT-ADJEC-I ; 

LEXICON A-BAKIAB

бакӏаб%<adj%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:бакӏаб # ; 
бакӏаб%<adj%>%<m%>%<sg%>:вакӏав # ; 
бакӏаб%<adj%>%<f%>%<sg%>:якӏай # ; 
бакӏаб%<adj%>%<pl%>:ракӏал # ; 

LEXICON A-TIOCEBESEB

%<adj%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:бесеб # ; 
%<adj%>%<m%>%<sg%>:весев # ; 
%<adj%>%<f%>%<sg%>:есей # ; 
%<adj%>%<pl%>:ресел # ; 


LEXICON A-KINABGO

%<adj%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:бго # ; 
%<adj%>%<m%>%<sg%>:вго # ; 
%<adj%>%<f%>%<sg%>:йго # ; 
%<adj%>%<pl%>:лго # ; 

LEXICON Nouns 
рагӏал:рагӏал N-RAGIAL ; ! "край, конец, оконечность, окраина"
LEXICON ProperNouns 
Аваристан:Аваристан NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; ! ""
Билкан:Билкан NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; ! ""
Евразия:Евразия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; ! ""
Турция:Турция NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; ! ""
Германия:Германия NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; ! "" ! Use/Sub
Омск:Омск NP-TOP-BUJNAKSK ; ! ""
Кисловодск:Кисловодск NP-TOP-BUJNAKSK ; ! ""
Челябинск:Челябинск NP-TOP-BUJNAKSK ; ! ""
Каспийск:Каспийск NP-TOP-BUJNAKSK ; ! ""
Америкаялъул% Цолъарал% Штатал:Америкаялъул% Цолъарал% Штатал NP-TOP-PL ; 
Зирани:Зирани NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; ! ""
Бежтӏа:Бежтӏа NP-TOP-ROSSIJA ; ! ""
Сугъралъ:Сугъралъ NP-TOP-DAGHISTAN ; ! ""
ЮФО:ЮФО NP-TOP-ACSH ; ! ""
АЦШ:АЦШ NP-TOP-ACSH ; ! ""
РСФСР:РСФСР NP-TOP-SSSR ; ! ""
ССР:ССР NP-TOP-SSSR ; ! ""
ДР:ДР NP-TOP-ACSH ; ! ""
РФ:РФ NP-TOP-ACSH ; ! ""
Казах% ССР:Казах% ССР NP-TOP-SSSR ; ! ""
ЧИАССР:ЧИАССР NP-TOP-SSSR ; ! ""
ФАП:ФАП NP-AL-GES ; ! ""
РКЦ:РКЦ NP-AL-NKVD ; ! ""
ГАИ:ГАИ NP-AL-NKVD ; ! ""
РАН:РАН NP-AL-KPSS ; ! ""
ДПС:ДПС NP-AL-KPSS ; ! ""
ООН:ООН NP-AL-KPSS ; ! ""
МЧС:МЧС NP-AL-KPSS ; ! ""
ГЭС:ГЭС NP-AL-GES ; ! ""
ДГПУ:ДГПУ NP-AL-NKVD ; ! ""
РОВД:РОВД NP-AL-NKVD ; ! ""
Татьяна:Татьяна NP-ANT-F-ZAREMA ; ! ""
Асма:Асма NP-ANT-F-ZAREMA ; ! ""
Маржанат:Маржанат NP-ANT-F-MASHIDAT ; ! ""
Людмила:Людмила NP-ANT-F-ZAREMA ; ! ""
Екатерина:Екатерина NP-ANT-F-ZAREMA ; ! ""
Зайнаб:Зайнаб NP-ANT-F-MASHIDAT ; ! ""
Сидрат:Сидрат NP-ANT-F-MASHIDAT ; ! ""
Мариям:Мариям NP-ANT-F-MASHIDAT ; ! ""
Къебедов:Къебедов NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Амутинов:Амутинов NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Стрелков:Стрелков NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
ХӀаминдулаев:ХӀаминдулаев NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Толстой:Толсто NP-COG-OJ ; ! ""
Матевосян:Матевосян NP-COG-IAN ; ! ""
Хлопонин:Хлопонин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Путин:Путин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Смолинин:Смолинин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Сталин:Сталин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Анищенко:Анищенко NP-COG-DZE ; ! ""
Денисенко:Денисенко NP-COG-DZE ; ! ""
Корниенко:Корниенко NP-COG-DZE ; ! ""
Овчиенко:Овчиенко NP-COG-DZE ; ! ""
Бадрудин:Бадрудин NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Адам:Адам NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
ГӀабдула:ГӀабдула NP-ANT-M-DAKU ; ! ""
Мурат:Мурат NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Закар:Закар NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Абу:Абу NP-ANT-M-DAKU ; ! ""
Даку:Даку NP-ANT-M-DAKU ; ! ""
ГӀали:ГӀали NP-ANT-M-DAKU ; ! ""
Олимпия:Олимпия NP-AL-EDINAJA-ROSSIJA ; ! ""
Новое% дело:Новое% дело NP-AL ; ! ""
Единая% Россия:Единая% Россия NP-AL-EDINAJA-ROSSIJA ; ! ""
Дагестангазсервис:Дагестангазсервис NP-AL ; ! ""
Шинник:Шинник NP-AL ; ! ""
Дакул:Дакул NP-AL ; ! "" FIXME:cog?
Дагестанская% энергосбытовая% компания:Дагестанская% энергосбытовая% компания NP-AL-EDINAJA-ROSSIJA ; ! ""
С%.:С%. NP-ANT-INIT ; ! ""
Д%.:Д%. NP-ANT-INIT ; ! ""
Б%.:Б%. NP-ANT-INIT ; ! ""
ГӀ%.:ГӀ%. NP-ANT-INIT ; ! ""
Дагестанские% Огни:Дагестанские% Огни NP-TOP-LENINSKIJ ; ! ""
Каспий:Каспий NP-TOP-LENINSKIJ ; ! ""
Сулейман%-Стальский:Сулейман%-Стальский NP-TOP-LENINSKIJ ; ! ""
Советский:Советский NP-TOP-LENINSKIJ ; ! ""
LEXICON Adjectives 
кинабго:кина A-KINABGO ; ! "всё" ! FIXME:checkpos
кӏиябго:кӏия A-KINABGO ; ! "обо" ! FIXME:checkpos
тӏоцебесеб:тӏоце A-TIOCEBESEB ; ! "первый"
цебесеб:це A-TIOCEBESEB ; ! "прежний"
официалияб:официалия A-KUDIJA ; ! ""
рахьдал:рахьдал A-GHARAB ; ! "молочный, родной"
ингилис:ингилис A-GHARAB ; ! "английский"
магӏарул:магӏарул A-GHARAB ; ! "горный, аварский, горский"
бетӏергьанаб:бетӏергьана A-KUDIJA ; ! "собственный; принадлежащий "
A-BAKIAB ; ! ""
бацӏцӏадаб:бацӏцӏадаб A-BACICIADAB-NT ; ! "чистый"
бацӏцӏадаб:вацӏцӏадав A-BACICIADAB-M ; ! "чистый"
бацӏцӏадаб:яцӏцӏадай A-BACICIADAB-F ; ! "чистый"
бащадаб:бащадаб A-BACICIADAB-NT ; ! "равный"
бащадаб:ващадав A-BACICIADAB-M ; ! "равный"
бащадаб:ящадай A-BACICIADAB-F ; ! "равный"
бащадаб:ращадал A-BACICIADAB-PL ; ! "равный"
борхатаб:борхатаб A-BACICIADAB-NT ; ! "высокий"
борхатаб:ворхатав A-BACICIADAB-M ; ! "высокий"
борхатаб:йорхатай A-BACICIADAB-F ; ! "высокий"
борхатаб:рорхатал A-BACICIADAB-PL ; ! "высокий"
бегӏераб:бегӏераб A-BACICIADAB-NT ; ! "острый"
бегӏераб:вегӏерав A-BACICIADAB-M ; ! "острый"
бегӏераб:йегӏерай A-BACICIADAB-F ; ! "острый"
бегӏераб:регӏерар A-BACICIADAB-PL ; ! "острый"
районалъулаб:районалъула A-KUDIJA ; ! ""
турк:турк A-GHARAB ; ! ""
исполнительнияб:исполнительния A-KUDIJA ; ! ""
